Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1824.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-214.01, to read: START_STATUTE15-214.01. Blindness compensatory skills; teacher certification; rules; definitions A. The state board of education shall adopt rules to ensure that blind pupils and visually IMPAIRED PUPILS receive appropriate high-quality blindness compensatory skills instruction that is aligned with the expanded core curriculum by requiring: 1. teachers who provide orientation and mobility instruction to blind pupils or visually impaired pupils to possess and maintain either: (a) A nationally recognized orientation and mobility certification, or an equivalent certification approved by the state board of education. (b) An orientation and mobility specialist certification approved by the state board of education. 2. teachers who provide rehabilitation instruction or independent living skills instruction to blind pupils or visually impaired pupils to possess and maintain either: (a) A nationally recognized certification in rehabilitation teaching for the blind, or an equivalent certification approved by the state board of education. (b) A vision rehabilitation therapist certification. B. The state board of education may adopt rules to implement this section and shall prescribe deadlines for teachers to satisfy the requirements prescribed by subsection A of this section. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Blind pupil" means a pupil who meets any of the following: (a) Cannot successfully use vision as a primary and efficient mode of learning. (b) Exhibits a low visual acuity or low visual field and, as a result, does not use vision as a primary mode of learning. (c) Has a medically indicated prognosis of visual deterioration. 2. "Compensatory skill" means a skill that a blind pupil or visually impaired pupil needs to access all areas of the general curriculum. 3. "Expanded core curriculum" includes the knowledge, concepts and skills that are learned incidentally by pupils who are not blind pupils or visually impaired pupils and that must be directly taught to blind pupils or visually impaired pupils. 4. "Orientation and mobility" means the ability to travel safely and effectively in an environment by using alternative blindness skills. 5. "Rehabilitation instruction" means instruction in compensatory skills and access technology skills that are necessary to perform daily living activities.  END_STATUTE